District of Columbia statutes.
15-110

Interest on judgment on contracts made elsewhere.

In an action on a contract for the payment of a higher rate of interest than is lawful in the District, made or to be performed in a State or territory of the United States where such a contract rate of interest is lawful, the judgment for the plaintiff shall include the contract interest to the date of the judgment and interest thereafter at the rate of 6 per cent per annum until paid.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 678, Pub. L. 88-509, § 3(b)(1)
1981 Ed., § 15-110.
1973 Ed., § 15-110.